Utah statutes.
17-33-9.   Acceptance of exempt position by career service employee -- Reappointment register.

(1) Any career service employee accepting an appointment to an exempt position who is not retained by the appointing officer, unless discharged for cause as provided by this act or by regulation, shall:

(a)  be appointed to any career service position for which the employee qualifies in a pay grade comparable to the employee's last position in the career service provided an opening exists; or

(b)  be appointed to any lesser career service position for which the employee qualifies pending the opening of a position described in Subsection (1) of this section.

(2)  The director shall maintain a reappointment register to facilitate the operation of this section, which shall have precedence over other registers.



Enacted by Chapter 81, 1981 General Session

